Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 17. Transition Provisions

§ 17-16-1701.
Application to existing domestic corporations.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, this act applies to domestic corporations in existence on its effective date that were incorporated under any general statute of this state providing for incorporation of corporations for profit if power to amend or repeal the statute under which the corporation was incorporated was reserved.

For corporations incorporated in Wyoming prior to the effective date of this act, the cumulative voting and shareholder preemptive rights provisions contained in former W.S. 17-1-123 and 17-1-130 are continued for a period of four (4) years from the effective date of this act unless the corporation amends its articles of incorporation to provide otherwise.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1992, ch. 53, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

As to the “effective date of this act,” referred to in both subsections (a) and (b), see “Revision of title” note following title 17 heading.

As to provisions contained in former §§ 17-1-123 and 17-1-130, referred to in subsection (b), see “Revision of title” note following title 17 heading.

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The 2004 amendment

inserted “former” preceding “W.S. 17-1-123” in (b).

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 17-16-1702.
Applications to qualified foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on the effective date of this act is subject to this act but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

As to the “effective date of this act,” referred to in this section, see “Revision of title” note following title 17 heading.

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§ 17-16-1703.
Saving provisions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the repeal of a statute by this act does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute, or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or

Any proceeding, reorganization or dissolution commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by this act is reduced by this act, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

As to repeal of prior provisions, referred to in this section, see “Revision of title” note following title 17 heading.

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.

§§ 17-16-1704 through 17-16-1706.
[Reserved.]

§ 17-16-1720.
Transfer of a Wyoming corporation to another jurisdiction.

A corporation incorporated, domesticated or continued under this act may, if authorized by resolution duly adopted as set forth in subsection (g) of this section, and by the laws of any other jurisdiction, within or without the United States, apply to the proper officer of the other jurisdiction for a certificate of registration, and to the secretary of state of this state for a certificate of transfer. The application for certificate of transfer shall set forth the following:

The name of the corporation immediately prior to the transfer, and if that name is unavailable for use in the foreign jurisdiction or the corporation desires to change its name in connection with the transfer, the name by which the corporation will be known in the foreign jurisdiction;

A statement of the jurisdiction to which the corporation is to be transferred;

A statement that the corporation shall surrender its certificate of incorporation under this act upon the effectiveness of the transfer;

A statement that the transfer was duly approved by the directors and the shareholders in the manner required under subsection (g) of this section; and

Any other terms and conditions of the transfer, including any desired amendments to the articles of incorporation of the corporation following its transfer.

The secretary of state shall require that the corporation maintain within the state an agent for service of process for at least one (1) year after the transfer is effected and shall impose any conditions he considers appropriate for the protection of creditors and stockholders, including the provision of notice to the public of the application described in subsection (a) of this section, the provision of a bond or a deposit of funds in an appropriate depository located in Wyoming and subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of Wyoming, and if such conditions are not met, the secretary of state may refuse to issue a certificate of transfer.

The secretary of state, upon compliance by the applicant and the secretary with subsections (a) and (b) of this section and receipt of payment of the special toll charge prescribed by subsection (e) of this section shall immediately transmit a notice of issuance of a certificate of transfer to the proper officer of the jurisdiction to which the corporation is transferred.

Upon issuance of a certificate of transfer, the corporation shall be continued as if it had been incorporated under the laws of the other jurisdiction and becomes a corporation under the laws of the other jurisdiction upon issuance by such jurisdiction of a certificate of registration.

Every corporation organized, domesticated or continued under the laws of this state in order to receive a certificate of transfer pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall pay to the secretary of state, in addition to all other statutory taxes and fees, a special toll charge of sixty dollars ($60.00).

through (x) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 115, § 3.

A resolution to transfer the corporation to another jurisdiction shall be adopted by the board of directors, and shall thereafter be submitted to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the resolution, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors shall transmit to the shareholders the basis for that determination. The board of directors may condition its submission of the resolution to the shareholders on any basis. If the approval of the shareholders is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the resolution for transfer is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the resolution and of the articles of incorporation of the corporation as they will be in effect in the new jurisdiction immediately after the transfer. Unless the articles of incorporation or the board of directors requires a greater vote or a greater number of votes to be present, approval of the resolution requires the affirmative vote of a majority of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum, consisting of a majority of the votes entitled to be cast, is present, and, if any class or series of shares is entitled to vote as a separate group on the resolution, the approval of each such separate voting group at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group consisting of at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the resolution by that voting group exists. Separate voting by voting groups is required to the extent the same would be required for a proposed amendment to the articles of incorporation.

The corporation may represent to the proper officer of the jurisdiction to which the corporation is transferred that the laws of the state of Wyoming permit such transfer, and may describe the permission extended by this section as authorizing the domestication, continuance or other transfer of domicile as may be required by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction in order for the corporation to be accepted in that jurisdiction, provided that the corporation may not misrepresent the requirements or effects of the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 117, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 28-1001; C.S. 1945, § 44-401; W.S. 1957, § 17-46; W.S. 1977, §§ 17-1-804,

17-2-101

; Laws 1980, ch. 50, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 47, § 1; 1987, ch. 174, § 1; 1989, ch. 249, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2; 2021 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

This section has been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

The provisions in this section do not align directly with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, or contain provisions not included in the Model Act.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, rewrote (a), which read: “A corporation incorporated or continued under this act may, if authorized by resolution duly adopted by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the holders of the issued shares of each class of stock of the corporation, whether or not entitled to vote on any other issue, and by the laws of any other jurisdiction, apply to the proper officer of the other jurisdiction for a certificate of registration, and to the secretary of state of this state for a certificate of transfer”; substituted “of fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “equal to the percentage of the net actual value of its assets, wherever located, as follows, but in no case shall any special toll charge be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” in the introductory language of (e); repealed former (e)(i) through (x), which read: “(i) Upon the first one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)
. . . . .
one percent (1%);

“(ii) Upon the second million dollars ($2,000,000.00)
. . . . .
nine-tenths of one percent (0.9%);

“(iii) Upon the third million dollars ($3,000,000.00)
. . . . .
eight-tenths of one percent (0.8%);

“(iv) Upon the fourth million dollars ($4,000,000.00)
. . . . .
seven-tenths of one percent (0.7%);

“(v) Upon the fifth million dollars ($5,000,000.00)
. . . . .
six-tenths of one percent (0.6%);

“(vi) Upon the sixth million dollars ($6,000,000.00)
. . . . .
five-tenths of one percent (0.5%);

“(vii) Upon the seventh million dollars ($7,000,000.00)
. . . . .
four-tenths of one percent (0.4%);

“(viii) Upon the eighth million dollars ($8,000,000.00) . . . . . three-tenths of one percent (0.3%);

“(ix) Upon the ninth million dollars ($9,000,000.00)
. . . . .
two-tenths of one percent (0.2%); and

“(x) Upon the tenth million dollars ($10,000,000.00) and each additional million dollars or fraction thereof
. . . . .
one-tenth of one percent (0.1%).”; repealed former (f), which read: “The secretary of state shall determine the net actual value of the assets of a corporation liable for the special toll charge imposed by subsection (e) of this section. The secretary of state shall withhold issuance of a certificate of transfer until payment of the special toll charge is made or guaranteed in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state.”; and added (g) and (h).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "sixty dollars ($60.00)" for "fifty dollars ($50.00)" in (e).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-16-101

.